Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-407.07
Law; operative date, defined.

After August 27, 1943, any company may file with the Department of Insurance a written notice of its election to comply with the provisions of sections 44-407 to 44-407.07 after a specified date before January 1, 1950. After the filing of such notice, then upon such specified date (which shall be the operative date for such company) said sections shall become operative with respect to the policies thereafter issued by such company. If a company makes no such election, the operative date of said sections for such company shall be January 1, 1950.

Laws 1943, c. 106, § 5(7), p. 367;

R.S.1943, § 44-407.07;

Laws 1947, c. 163, § 1, p. 451.